Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.340.010

Increased curriculum programs and opportunities.

Eligible school districts as defined under RCW 28A.340.020 are encouraged to establish cooperative projects with a primary purpose to increase curriculum programs and opportunities among the participating districts, by expanding the opportunity for students in the participating districts to take vocational and academic courses as may be generally more available in larger school districts, and to enhance student learning.

[ 1990 c 33 s 366; 1988 c 268 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.100.080.]

NOTES:

Findings—1988 c 268: "The legislature finds that partnerships among school districts can: Increase curriculum offerings for students, encourage creative educational programming and staffing, and result in the cost-effective delivery of educational programs. It is the intent of the legislature to establish a program to facilitate and encourage such partnerships among small school districts." [ 1988 c 268 s 1.]

Severability—1988 c 268: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1988 c 268 s 12.]